Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-324
Farm trailer, defined.

Farm trailer means a trailer or semitrailer belonging to a farmer or rancher and used wholly and exclusively to carry supplies to or from the owner's farm or ranch, used by a farmer or rancher to carry his or her own agricultural products to or from storage or market, or used by a farmer or rancher for hauling of supplies or agricultural products in exchange of services. Farm trailer does not include a trailer so used when attached to a farm tractor.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 24;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 23.